output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX Hx Y 11
SFX Hx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Hx 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Hx ec ce/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec ca/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec cev/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec cu/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec cah/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec cam/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec cem/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec cami/xPxE .
SFX Hx ec če/xPxE .

SFX Hy Y 68
SFX Hy ti l .
SFX Hy ti la .
SFX Hy ti lo .
SFX Hy ti li .
SFX Hy zditi ždžu .
SFX Hy ti m .
SFX Hy ti š .
SFX Hy ti 0 .
SFX Hy ti mo .
SFX Hy i e .
SFX Hy iti et .
SFX Hy ti h .
SFX Hy ti še .
SFX Hy ti hmo .
SFX Hy ti ste .
SFX Hy ti hu .
SFX Hy iti eči .
SFX Hy iti eča .
SFX Hy iti eče .
SFX Hy ti my .
SFX Hy ti mogo .
SFX Hy ti momu .
SFX Hy ti mym .
SFX Hy ti mom .
SFX Hy ti mo .
SFX Hy ti ma .
SFX Hy ti mu .
SFX Hy ti moj .
SFX Hy ti moju .
SFX Hy ti mi .
SFX Hy ti me .
SFX Hy ti myh .
SFX Hy ti mym .
SFX Hy ti mymi .
SFX Hy ti vši .
SFX Hy ti všego .
SFX Hy ti všemu .
SFX Hy ti všim .
SFX Hy ti všem .
SFX Hy ti vših .
SFX Hy ti všimi .
SFX Hy ti vša .
SFX Hy ti všu .
SFX Hy ti všej .
SFX Hy ti všeju .
SFX Hy ti vše .
SFX Hy zditi ždženy .
SFX Hy zditi ždženogo .
SFX Hy zditi ždženomu .
SFX Hy zditi ždženym .
SFX Hy zditi ždženom .
SFX Hy zditi ždženi .
SFX Hy zditi ždžene .
SFX Hy zditi ždženyh .
SFX Hy zditi ždženymi .
SFX Hy zditi ždžena .
SFX Hy zditi ždženu .
SFX Hy zditi ždženoj .
SFX Hy zditi ždženoju .
SFX Hy zditi ždženo .
SFX Hy zditi ždženje/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženja/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženju/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženjem/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženij/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženjam/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženjami/xPxE .
SFX Hy zditi ždženjah/xPxE .

SFX Hz Y 72
SFX Hz sti dl .
SFX Hz sti dla .
SFX Hz sti dlo .
SFX Hz sti dli .
SFX Hz sti du .
SFX Hz sti dem .
SFX Hz sti deš .
SFX Hz sti de .
SFX Hz sti demo .
SFX Hz sti dete .
SFX Hz sti dut .
SFX Hz sti deh .
SFX Hz sti deše .
SFX Hz sti dehmo .
SFX Hz sti deste .
SFX Hz sti dehu .
SFX Hz sti di .
SFX Hz sti dimo .
SFX Hz sti dite .
SFX Hz sti duči .
SFX Hz sti dučego .
SFX Hz sti dučemu .
SFX Hz sti dučim .
SFX Hz sti dučem .
SFX Hz sti dučih .
SFX Hz sti dučimi .
SFX Hz sti duča .
SFX Hz sti duču .
SFX Hz sti dučej .
SFX Hz sti dučeju .
SFX Hz sti duče .
SFX Hz sti domy .
SFX Hz sti domogo .
SFX Hz sti domomu .
SFX Hz sti domym .
SFX Hz sti domom .
SFX Hz sti domo .
SFX Hz sti doma .
SFX Hz sti domu .
SFX Hz sti domoj .
SFX Hz sti domoju .
SFX Hz sti domi .
SFX Hz sti dome .
SFX Hz sti domyh .
SFX Hz sti domym .
SFX Hz sti domymi .
SFX Hz sti domo .
SFX Hz sti dši .
SFX Hz sti dša .
SFX Hz sti dše .
SFX Hz sti deny .
SFX Hz sti denogo .
SFX Hz sti denomu .
SFX Hz sti denym .
SFX Hz sti denom .
SFX Hz sti deni .
SFX Hz sti dene .
SFX Hz sti denyh .
SFX Hz sti denymi .
SFX Hz sti dena .
SFX Hz sti denu .
SFX Hz sti denoj .
SFX Hz sti denoju .
SFX Hz sti deno .
SFX Hz sti denje/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denja/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denju/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denjem/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denij/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denjam/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denjami/xPxE .
SFX Hz sti denjah/xPxE .

SFX IA Y 9
SFX IA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX IA e e/xPxBxO .
SFX IA e a/xPxE .
SFX IA e 0 .
SFX IA e u/xPxE .
SFX IA e ah/xPxE .
SFX IA e am/xPxE .
SFX IA 0 m/xPxE .
SFX IA e ami/xPxE .

SFX IB Y 37
SFX IB ti l .
SFX IB ti la .
SFX IB ti lo .
SFX IB ti li .
SFX IB ti ju .
SFX IB ti m .
SFX IB ti ješ .
SFX IB ti š .
SFX IB ti je .
SFX IB ti 0 .
SFX IB ti jemo .
SFX IB ti mo .
SFX IB ti jete .
SFX IB i e .
SFX IB ti jut .
SFX IB ti h .
SFX IB ti še .
SFX IB ti hmo .
SFX IB ti ste .
SFX IB ti hu .
SFX IB ti j .
SFX IB ti jmo .
SFX IB ti jte .
SFX IB ti juči .
SFX IB ti juča .
SFX IB ti juče .
SFX IB ti jemy .
SFX IB ti jema .
SFX IB ti my .
SFX IB ti ma .
SFX IB ti vši .
SFX IB ti vša .
SFX IB ti vše .
SFX IB ti ny .
SFX IB ti na .
SFX IB ti no .
SFX IB ti nje .

SFX IC Y 68
SFX IC ti l .
SFX IC ti la .
SFX IC ti lo .
SFX IC ti li .
SFX IC titi ču .
SFX IC ti m .
SFX IC ti š .
SFX IC ti 0 .
SFX IC ti mo .
SFX IC i e .
SFX IC iti et .
SFX IC ti h .
SFX IC ti še .
SFX IC ti hmo .
SFX IC ti ste .
SFX IC ti hu .
SFX IC iti eči .
SFX IC iti eča .
SFX IC iti eče .
SFX IC ti my .
SFX IC ti mogo .
SFX IC ti momu .
SFX IC ti mym .
SFX IC ti mom .
SFX IC ti mo .
SFX IC ti ma .
SFX IC ti mu .
SFX IC ti moj .
SFX IC ti moju .
SFX IC ti mi .
SFX IC ti me .
SFX IC ti myh .
SFX IC ti mym .
SFX IC ti mymi .
SFX IC ti vši .
SFX IC ti všego .
SFX IC ti všemu .
SFX IC ti všim .
SFX IC ti všem .
SFX IC ti vših .
SFX IC ti všimi .
SFX IC ti vša .
SFX IC ti všu .
SFX IC ti všej .
SFX IC ti všeju .
SFX IC ti vše .
SFX IC titi čeny .
SFX IC titi čenogo .
SFX IC titi čenomu .
SFX IC titi čenym .
SFX IC titi čenom .
SFX IC titi čeni .
SFX IC titi čene .
SFX IC titi čenyh .
SFX IC titi čenymi .
SFX IC titi čena .
SFX IC titi čenu .
SFX IC titi čenoj .
SFX IC titi čenoju .
SFX IC titi čeno .
SFX IC titi čenje/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenja/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenju/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenjem/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenij/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenjam/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenjami/xPxE .
SFX IC titi čenjah/xPxE .

SFX ID Y 68
SFX ID ti l .
SFX ID ti la .
SFX ID ti lo .
SFX ID ti li .
SFX ID ěti žu .
SFX ID ěti im .
SFX ID ěti iš .
SFX ID ěti i .
SFX ID ěti imo .
SFX ID ěti ite .
SFX ID ěti et .
SFX ID ti h .
SFX ID ti še .
SFX ID ti hmo .
SFX ID ti ste .
SFX ID ti hu .
SFX ID ěti eči .
SFX ID ěti eča .
SFX ID ěti eče .
SFX ID ěti imy .
SFX ID ěti imogo .
SFX ID ěti imomu .
SFX ID ěti imym .
SFX ID ěti imom .
SFX ID ěti imo .
SFX ID ěti ima .
SFX ID ěti imu .
SFX ID ěti imoj .
SFX ID ěti imoju .
SFX ID ěti imi .
SFX ID ěti ime .
SFX ID ěti imyh .
SFX ID ěti imym .
SFX ID ěti imymi .
SFX ID ti vši .
SFX ID ti všego .
SFX ID ti všemu .
SFX ID ti všim .
SFX ID ti všem .
SFX ID ti vših .
SFX ID ti všimi .
SFX ID ti vša .
SFX ID ti všu .
SFX ID ti všej .
SFX ID ti všeju .
SFX ID ti vše .
SFX ID ti ny .
SFX ID ti nogo .
SFX ID ti nomu .
SFX ID ti nym .
SFX ID ti nom .
SFX ID ti ni .
SFX ID ti ne .
SFX ID ti nyh .
SFX ID ti nymi .
SFX ID ti na .
SFX ID ti nu .
SFX ID ti noj .
SFX ID ti noju .
SFX ID ti no .
SFX ID ti nje/xPxE .
SFX ID ti nja/xPxE .
SFX ID ti nju/xPxE .
SFX ID ti njem/xPxE .
SFX ID ti nij/xPxE .
SFX ID ti njam/xPxE .
SFX ID ti njami/xPxE .
SFX ID ti njah/xPxE .

SFX IE Y 72
SFX IE ti l .
SFX IE ti la .
SFX IE ti lo .
SFX IE ti li .
SFX IE ti u .
SFX IE ti em .
SFX IE ti eš .
SFX IE ti e .
SFX IE ti emo .
SFX IE ti ete .
SFX IE ti ut .
SFX IE ti eh .
SFX IE ti eše .
SFX IE ti ehmo .
SFX IE ti este .
SFX IE ti ehu .
SFX IE ti i .
SFX IE ti imo .
SFX IE ti ite .
SFX IE ti uči .
SFX IE ti učego .
SFX IE ti učemu .
SFX IE ti učim .
SFX IE ti učem .
SFX IE ti učih .
SFX IE ti učimi .
SFX IE ti uča .
SFX IE ti uču .
SFX IE ti učej .
SFX IE ti učeju .
SFX IE ti uče .
SFX IE ti omy .
SFX IE ti omogo .
SFX IE ti omomu .
SFX IE ti omym .
SFX IE ti omom .
SFX IE ti omo .
SFX IE ti oma .
SFX IE ti omu .
SFX IE ti omoj .
SFX IE ti omoju .
SFX IE ti omi .
SFX IE ti ome .
SFX IE ti omyh .
SFX IE ti omym .
SFX IE ti omymi .
SFX IE ti omo .
SFX IE ti ši .
SFX IE ti ša .
SFX IE ti še .
SFX IE ti eny .
SFX IE ti enogo .
SFX IE ti enomu .
SFX IE ti enym .
SFX IE ti enom .
SFX IE ti eni .
SFX IE ti ene .
SFX IE ti enyh .
SFX IE ti enymi .
SFX IE ti ena .
SFX IE ti enu .
SFX IE ti enoj .
SFX IE ti enoju .
SFX IE ti eno .
SFX IE ti enje/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enja/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enju/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enjem/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enij/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enjam/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enjami/xPxE .
SFX IE ti enjah/xPxE .

SFX IF Y 39
SFX IF ti l .
SFX IF ti la .
SFX IF ti lo .
SFX IF ti li .
SFX IF ti h .
SFX IF ti s .
SFX IF ti 0 .
SFX IF ti hmo .
SFX IF ti ste .
SFX IF yti ěh .
SFX IF yti ěše .
SFX IF yti ěhmo .
SFX IF yti ěste .
SFX IF yti ěhu .
SFX IF yti udu .
SFX IF yti udeš .
SFX IF yti ude .
SFX IF yti udemo .
SFX IF yti udete .
SFX IF yti udut .
SFX IF yti ud .
SFX IF yti udmo .
SFX IF yti udte .
SFX IF ti vši .
SFX IF ti všego .
SFX IF ti všemu .
SFX IF ti všim .
SFX IF ti všem .
SFX IF ti vših .
SFX IF ti všimi .
SFX IF ti vša .
SFX IF ti všu .
SFX IF ti všej .
SFX IF ti všeju .
SFX IF ti vše .
SFX IF i y .
SFX IF i a .
SFX IF i o .
SFX IF i je .
