output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
konec/Hx
jezditi/Hy
izvesti/Hz
solnce/IA
vladati/IB
vladěti/IB
zahvatiti/IC
prděti/ID
klatiti/IC
vlězti/IE
byti/IF
čudovišče/IA
krasti/Hz
skratiti/IC
posvetiti/IC
gryzti/IE
věnec/Hx
klasti/Hz
ukrasti/Hz
napasti/Hz
nenaviděti/ID
posětiti/IC
shvatiti/IC
upasti/Hz
odvratiti/IC
nesti/IE
sěděti/ID
svetiti/IC
jajce/IA
vezti/IE
vratiti/IC
sbože/IA
gleděti/ID
razpasti/Hz
platiti/IC
viděti/ID
obogatiti/IC
grnec/Hx
ležišče/IA
igrišče/IA
lězti/IE
zaplatiti/IC
srdce/IA
povratiti/IC
obratiti/IC
prinesti/IE
tratiti/IC
iztratiti/IC
privezti/IE
zabezpametiti/IC
vvesti/Hz
obgleděti/ID
donesti/IE
prěvesti/Hz
stupenišče/IA
potresti/IE
tresti/IE
prěgleděti/ID
tajnišče/IA
propasti/Hz
pohytiti/IC
sědališče/IA
odplatiti/IC
odnesti/IE
odvesti/Hz
pasti/Hz
podgleděti/ID
prěnesti/IE
prěvezti/IE
prědviděti/ID
prědplatiti/IC
snesti/IE
vnesti/IE
iznesti/IE
raznesti/IE
vvezti/IE
provesti/Hz
razvesti/IE
odvezti/IE
izvezti/IE
ogleděti/ID
uviděti/ID
ugryzti/IE
odgryzti/IE
spasti/Hz
odpasti/Hz
prosvětiti/IC
nadgleděti/ID
ugleděti/ID
razgleděti/ID
dogleděti/ID
domče/IA
dovezti/IE
izplatiti/IC
koljce/IA
kurec/Hx
polnomočje/IA
prězvišče/IA
prigleděti/ID
pristanišče/IA
proizvesti/Hz
snabděti/ID
srědišče/IA
utratiti/IC
ščititi/IC
zatresti/IE
vesti/Hz
vgleděti/ID
zaščititi/IC
osamotiti/IC
ranec/Hx
sebesmrtiti/IC
osvatiti/IC
svatiti/IC
letišče/IA
učilišče/IA
raztratiti/IC
čtiti/IC
gledišče/IA
gonišče/IA
grobišče/IA
izgnanec/Hx
izpolzti/IE
jalovec/Hx
križišče/IA
lanec/Hx
mokrišče/IA
mravišče/IA
nadglavišče/IA
obhvatiti/IC
obrazec/Hx
ognišče/IA
podnožišče/IA
polzti/IE
popolzti/IE
presti/Hz
stanovišče/IA
strělišče/IA
topišče/IA
usesti/Hz
vozvesti/Hz
zavratiti/IC
zemjedělišče/IA
krutiti/IC
skladišče/IA
trgovišče/IA
vozbogatiti/IC
valec/Hx
žilišče/IA
bděti/ID
lože/IA
ložišče/IA
mutiti/IC
smutiti/IC
smalec/Hx
usmrtiti/IC
voznesti/IE
pastvišče/IA
pripasti/Hz
spasti/IE
vpasti/Hz
posesti/Hz
ssesti/Hz
zasvětiti/IC
razvesti/Hz
věče/IA
vozvratiti/IC
izvratiti/IC
prěobratiti/IC
osirotiti/IC
sirotišče/IA
tanec/Hx
ruměnec/Hx
provrtiti/IC
zapasti/Hz
uběžišče/IA
bodec/Hx
bosti/Hz
brazditi/Hy
čepec/Hx
gnězditi/Hy
gnojišče/IA
gostinec/Hx
gradišče/IA
kladec/Hx
krotiti/IC
lenišče/IA
lětovišče/IA
legovišče/IA
lovišče/IA
mlatiti/IC
nanesti/IE
nasytiti/IC
navesti/Hz
obgryzti/IE
objezditi/Hy
obnesti/IE
obvesti/Hz
oglušeti/IB
okotiti/IC
opasti/Hz
spresti/Hz
osesti/Hz
osvetiti/IC
osvětiti/IC
pozlatiti/IC
razgryzti/IE
razkrutiti/IC
razmlatiti/IC
razvezti/IE
zubec/Hx
privesti/Hz
ukrotiti/IC
ledovec/Hx
smlatiti/IC
parkovišče/IA
stojišče/IA
zlatiti/IC
nrěstilišče/IA
sytiti/IC
primětiti/IC
obkrasti/Hz
kotiti/IC
trizubec/Hx
dopolzti/IE
potiti/IC
spotiti/IC
koverec/Hx
iztresti/IE
otresti/IE
voztresti/IE
palec/Hx
bljudce/IA
svetilišče/IA
dovesti/Hz
drobjenec/Hx
zaviděti/ID
krajec/Hx
voplotiti/IC
prěsesti/Hz
skryvališče/IA
posměšišče/IA
izpasti/Hz
zrělišče/IA
